
DI264−1 2

−DIAGNOSTICS AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEM
DI−1 21

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM829E)

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART
If malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed for that code in the table below
(Proceed to the page given for that circuit.)
w/o Navigation system:

Blinking light Detection Item Trouble Area Memory

RrDEF Normal − −

RrDEF
FACE*

1

(DI−1 32)

Front roomtemperaturesensorcircuit SRoomtemp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenroomtemp.sensorandA/C
amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

RrDEF
B/L*

2

(DI−1 35)

Ambient temperaturesensorcircuit SAmbient temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenambient temp.sensorand
A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

RrDEF
FOOT

(DI−1 38)

Frontevaporator temperaturesensor
circuit

SEvaporator temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenevaporator temp.sensorand
A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

RrACSW,
FOOT

(DI−1 44)

Rearevaporator temperaturesensor
circuit

SRearevaporator temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenRearevaporator temp.sen-
sor and A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

RrACSW,
FACE*

1

(DI−1 47)

Rear roomtemperaturesensorcircuit SRear roomtemp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenrear roomtemp.sensorand
A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

RrDEF
F/D

(DI−1 41)

Enginecoolant temperaturesensorcir-
cuit

SEnginecoolant temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenenginecoolant temp.sensor
and A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

−

RrDEF
Solar sensor circuit (Open) SSolarsensor

S Harness orconnector between solar sensor and A/C amplifi
−

RrDEF
DEF*

3

(DI−1 50)
Solarsensorcircuit (Short)

SHarnessorconnectorbetweensolarsensorand A/Camplifi-
er

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

RrDEF
FRS

(DI−1 56)

Open inpressuresensorcircuit
Abnormal refrigerantpressure
[below 196kPa(2.0kgf/cm

2
,28psi)

over3, 140kPa(32.0kgf/cm
2

,455psi)]

SPressureswitch
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenpressureswitchandA/C

amplifier
SRefrigerantpipe line

SA/Camplifier

−

RrACSW, HI
(DI−1 60)

Rear linletair temperaturesensorcircuit SRear inletair temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenrear inletair temp.sensor
and A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

RrDEF
REC

(DI−1 63)

Frontairmixdamperpositionsensor
circuit

SAirmixdamperpositionsensor
SA/Camplifier
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenairmixdamperpositionsen-
sor and A/C amplifier

�

(1 min.ormore)

RrDEF
LO

(DI−1 67)

air inletdamperpositionsensorcircuit SAir inletdamperpositionsensorcircuit
SA/Camplifier
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenair inletdamperposition
sensor and A/C amplifier

�

(1 min.ormore)



DI−122
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LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM829E)

RrDEF
M1

(DI−1 63
DI−1 74)

Frontairmixdamperpositionsensor
circuit

SAirmixdampercontrol servomotor
SAirmixdamperpositionsensor
SHarnessandconnectorbetweenA/Camplifierandairmix
position sensor

SHarnessandconnectorbetweenA/Camplifierandairmix
damper control servomotor

SA/Camplifier

�

(15secs.ormore)

RrDEF
M2

(DI−1 67
DI−1 77)

Air inletdamperpositionsensorcircuit SAirmixdampercontrol servomotor
SAirmixdamperpositionsensor
SHarnessandconnectorbetweenA/Camplifierandairmix
position sensor

SHarnessandconnectorbetweenA/Camplifierandmix
damper control servomotor

SA/Camplifier

�

(15secs.ormore)

HINT:
S *1 If the roomtemp. isapprox. −20˚ C (−4˚ F)or lower,RrDEFandFACEindicatormaybe lightupeven

though the system is normal.
S *2 If theambient temperature isapprox. −50˚ C (−58˚ F)or lower,aDTCmaybeoutputeven though

the system is normal.
S *

3
If thecheck isbeingperformed inadarkplace,RrDEFandDEF(solarsensorcircuit abnormal) could

be light up. In this case, perform DTC check again while shining a light, such as an inspection light,
on the solar sensor. If RrDEF and DEF is still light up, there could be trouble in the solar sensor circuit.



−DIAGNOSTICS AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEM
DI−1 23

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM829E)

w/ Navigation system:

DTC No.
(See page)

Detection Item Trouble Area Memory

00 Normal − −

11 *
1

(DI−1 32)

Front roomtemperaturesensorcircuit SFront roomtemp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetween front roomtemp.sensorand
A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

12 *2
(DI−1 35)

Ambient temperaturesensorcircuit SAmbient temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenambient temp.sensorand
A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

13
(DI−1 38)

Frontevaporator temperaturesensor
circuit

SFrontevaporator temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetween frontevaporator temp.sen-
sor and A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

14
(DI−1 41)

Enginecoolant temperaturesensorcir-
cuit

SEnginecoolant temp.sensor
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenenginecoolant temp.sensor
and A/C amplifier

SA/Camplifier

−

21 *
3

Solar sensor circuit (Open) SSolarsensor
S Harness orconnector between solar sensor and A/C amplifi

−
21 *

3

(DI−1 50)
Solar sensor circuit (Short)

SHarnessorconnectorbetweensolarsensorand A/Camplifi-
er

SA/Camplifier

�

(8.5 min. or more)

22*
4

(DI−1 53)

All conditionsbelowaredetected for3
sec. or more
(a)Enginespeed:450 rpmormore
(b)Ratiobetweenengineandcompres-
sor rpmdeviates20%ormore incom-
parison to normal operation.

SCompressordrivebelt
SCompressor locksensor
SCompressor
SHarnessandconnectorbetweenA/Camplifierandcompres-
sor, compressor locksensor

SA/Camplifier

−

23
(DI−1 56)

Open inpressuresensorcircuit
Abnormal refrigerant pressure
[below 196kPa(2.0kgf/cm

2
,28psi)

over3, 140kPa(32.0kgf/cm
2

,455psi)]

SPressureswitch
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenpressureswitchandA/C

amplifier
SRefrigerantpipe line

SA/Camplifier

−

31
(DI−1 63)

Frontairmixdamperpositionsensor
circuit

SFrontairmixdamperpositionsensor
SA/Camplifier
SHarnessorconnectorbetween frontairmixdamperposition
sensor and A/C amplifier

�

(1 min.ormore)

32
(DI−1 63)

Air inletdamperpositionsensorcircuit SAir inletdamperpositionsensorcircuit
SA/Camplifier
SHarnessorconnectorbetweenair inletdamperposition
sensor and A/C amplifier

�

(1 min.ormore)
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41
(DI−1 63
DI−1 74)

Front air mix damper position sensor
circuit

S Front air mix damper control servomotor
S Front air mix damper position sensor
S Harness and connector between A/C amplifier front and air
mix position sensor

S Harness and connector between A/C amplifier and front air
mix damper control servomotor

S A/C amplifier

�

(15 secs. or more)

42
(DI−1 67
DI−1 77)

Air inlet damper position sensor circuit S Air mix damper control servomotor
S Air mix damper position sensor
S Harness and connector between A/C amplifier and air mix
position sensor

S Harness and connector between A/C amplifier and mix
damper control servomotor

S A/C amplifier

�

(15 secs. or more)

HINT:
S *1 If the room temp. is approx. −20˚ C (−4˚ F) or lower, DTC 11 may be light up even though the system

is normal.
S *2 If the ambient temperature is approx. −50˚ C (−58˚ F) or lower, a DTC may be output even though

the system is normal.
S * 

3 
If the check is being performed in a dark place, DTC 11 (solar sensor circuit abnormal) could be dis-

played. In this case, perform DTC check again while shining a light, such as an inspection light, on the
solar sensor. If DTC 11 is still displayed, there could be trouble in the solar sensor circuit.

S * 
4 

Compressor lock (DTC 22) is indicated only for a current malfunction. (See page DI−1 53)
To confirm DTC 22, preform the following steps.

(1)With theengineON,enter theDTCcheckmode.
(2) Press the R/F switch to enter actuator check mode, and set the operation to Step No. 3.
(3) Press the AUTO switch to return to DTC check mode.
(4) The DTC is displayed after approx. 3 secs.


